Nevada, session 83, AB210.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school that provides a program of distance
education may administer the examinations required pursuant to
NRS 390.105 and, if applicable for the grade levels of the pupils
enrolled, the college and career readiness assessment required
pursuant to NRS 390.610 to pupils enrolled in the program
through a remote testing platform in accordance with the
provisions of this section.
2. An examination or assessment that is administered to a
pupil enrolled in a program of distance education through a
remote testing platform must:
(a) Be composed of content that is the same as the content
contained in an examination or assessment administered pursuant
to NRS 390.105 or 390.610, as applicable, to a pupil in the same
grade whose examination or assessment is not administered
through a remote testing platform.
(b) Be administered at the time prescribed by the State Board
pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 390.105 or paragraph (a) of
subsection 4 of NRS 390.610, as applicable.
(c) Be administered in accordance with the plan adopted by the
Department pursuant to NRS 390.270 and with the plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 390.275 by the board of trustees of the school
district that provides the program of distance education.
3. For the duration of an examination or assessment
administered through a remote testing platform:
-
*AB210*

– 3 –
(a) Each pupil must be monitored by a proctor designated by
the board of trustees of the school district or governing body of the
charter school, as applicable, through the use of a video device. If
the remote testing platform used to administer an examination or
assessment pursuant to this section does not permit monitoring
through a video device integrated with the device used to
administer the examination or assessment, a separate video device
must be used to allow the proctor to monitor the pupil for the
duration of the examination or assessment.
(b) A pupil must be prohibited from exiting the remote testing
platform until instructed to do so by his or her proctor.
4. An examination or assessment administered pursuant to
this section must have a ratio of not more than 10 pupils for each
proctor. The proctor must verify the submission of the
examination or assessment from each pupil to whom he or she is
assigned.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Remote testing platform” means an electronic system
which allows an examination or assessment to be administered to
a pupil in a virtual test session that is initiated and managed by a
proctor who is in a location that is geographically separated from
the location of the pupil.
(b) “Video device” means an electronic device integrated with
a camera that is capable of transmitting live video to a separate
electronic device.
Sec. 2. NRS 388.820 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.820 As used in NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 388.823, 388.826 and 388.829
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 388.874 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.874 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations that
prescribe:
(a) The process for submission of an application by a person or
entity for inclusion of a course of distance education on the list
prepared by the Department pursuant to NRS 388.834 and the
contents of the application;
(b) The process for submission of an application by the board of
trustees of a school district, the governing body of a charter school
or a committee to form a charter school to provide a program of
distance education and the contents of the application;
(c) The qualifications and conditions for enrollment that a pupil
must satisfy to enroll in a program of distance education, consistent
with NRS 388.850 and any other applicable statute;
-
*AB210*

– 4 –
(d) A method for reporting to the Department the number of
pupils who are enrolled in a program of distance education and the
attendance of those pupils;
(e) The requirements for assessing the achievement of pupils
who are enrolled in a program of distance education, which must
include, without limitation, the administration of the examinations
required pursuant to NRS 390.105 and, if applicable for the grade
levels of the pupils enrolled, the college and career readiness
assessment pursuant to NRS 390.610; and
(f) A written description of the process pursuant to which the
State Board may revoke its approval for the operation of a program
of distance education.
2. The State Board may adopt regulations as it determines are
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 388.820 to 388.874,
inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 4. NRS 390.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.105 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the
State Board shall, in consultation with the Council to Establish
Academic Standards for Public Schools, prescribe examinations that
comply with 20 U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) and that measure the
achievement and proficiency of pupils:
(a) For grades 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8, in the standards of content
established by the Council for the subjects of English language arts
and mathematics.
(b) For grades 5 and 8, in the standards of content established by
the Council for the subject of science.
(c) For grades 9, 10, 11 and 12, in the standards of content
established by the Council for the subjects required to comply with
20 U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2).
 The examinations prescribed pursuant to this subsection must be
written, developed, printed and scored by a nationally recognized
testing company.
2. In addition to the examinations prescribed pursuant to
subsection 1, the State Board shall, in consultation with the Council
to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools, prescribe a
writing examination for grades 5 and 8.
3. The Department shall ensure the availability of:
(a) The examinations prescribed pursuant to subsections 1 and 2
to pupils in any language in which those examinations are
published; and
(b) Authorized supports to pupils who are English learners for
the examinations prescribed pursuant to subsections 1 and 2.
4. The State Board shall prescribe:
-
*AB210*

– 5 –
(a) The minimum number of school days that must take place
before the examinations prescribed by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 may be administered to pupils; and
(b) The period during which the examinations prescribed by the
State Board pursuant to subsection 1 must be administered.
5. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall administer the
examinations prescribed by the State Board at such times as
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 4. The
examinations must be:
(a) Administered in each school , and to pupils enrolled in a
program of distance education who are authorized to take the
examinations through a remote testing platform pursuant to
section 1 of this act, in accordance with uniform procedures adopted
by the State Board. The Department shall monitor the school
districts and individual schools to ensure compliance with the
uniform procedures.
(b) Administered in each school , and to pupils enrolled in a
program of distance education who are authorized to take the
examination through a remote testing platform pursuant to section
1 of this act, in accordance with the plan adopted pursuant to NRS
390.270 by the Department and with the plan adopted pursuant to
NRS 390.275 by the board of trustees of the school district in which
the examinations are administered. The Department shall monitor
the compliance of school districts and individual schools with:
(1) The plan adopted by the Department; and
(2) The plan adopted by the board of trustees of the
applicable school district, to the extent that the plan adopted by the
board of trustees of the school district is consistent with the plan
adopted by the Department.
6. The Department may temporarily waive or otherwise pause
the requirement to administer examinations that comply with 20
U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) pursuant to this section if the United States
Department of Education grants a waiver from or otherwise pauses
the requirements of 20 U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2).
Sec. 5. NRS 390.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.270 1. The Department shall, by regulation or otherwise,
adopt and enforce a plan setting forth procedures to ensure the
security of examinations that are administered to pupils pursuant to
NRS 390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610.
2. A plan adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
-
*AB210*

– 6 –
(a) Procedures pursuant to which pupils, school officials and
other persons may, and are encouraged to, report irregularities in
testing administration and testing security.
(b) Procedures necessary to ensure the security of test materials
and the consistency of testing administration.
(c) Procedures that specifically set forth the action that must be
taken in response to a report of an irregularity in testing
administration or testing security and the actions that must be taken
during an investigation of such an irregularity. For each action that
is required, the procedures must identify:
(1) By category, the employees of the school district, charter
school or Department, or any combination thereof, who are
responsible for taking the action; and
(2) Whether the school district, charter school or
Department, or any combination thereof, is responsible for ensuring
that the action is carried out successfully.
(d) Objective criteria that set forth the conditions under which a
school, including, without limitation, a charter school or a school
district, or both, is required to file a plan for corrective action in
response to an irregularity in testing administration or testing
security for the purposes of NRS 390.295.
(e) Procedures to ensure the security of examinations and
assessments administered to pupils enrolled in a program of
distance education through a remote testing platform pursuant to
section 1 of this act.
3. The Department shall post a copy of the plan adopted
pursuant to this section and the procedures set forth therein on the
Internet website maintained by the Department.
Sec. 6. NRS 390.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.275 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall,
for each public school in the district, including, without limitation,
charter schools [,] and programs of distance education, adopt and
enforce a plan setting forth procedures to ensure the security of
examinations and assessments.
2. A plan adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Procedures pursuant to which pupils, school officials and
other persons may, and are encouraged to, report irregularities in
testing administration and testing security.
(b) Procedures necessary to ensure the security of test materials
and the consistency of testing administration.
(c) With respect to secondary schools, procedures pursuant to
which the school district or charter school, as appropriate, will
verify the identity of pupils taking an examination or assessment.
-
*AB210*

– 7 –
(d) Procedures that specifically set forth the action that must be
taken in response to a report of an irregularity in testing
administration or testing security and the action that must be taken
during an investigation of such an irregularity. For each action that
is required, the procedures must identify, by category, the
employees of the school district or charter school who are
responsible for taking the action and for ensuring that the action is
carried out successfully.
(e) If the school district, or any charter school within the
school district, provides a program of distance education and the
school district allows students enrolled in the program to take
examinations or assessments administered through a remote
testing platform pursuant to section 1 of this act, procedures to
ensure the security of such examinations and assessments.
 The procedures adopted pursuant to this subsection must be
consistent, to the extent applicable, with the procedures adopted by
the Department pursuant to NRS 390.270.
3. A copy of each plan adopted pursuant to this section and the
procedures set forth therein must be submitted on or before
September 1 of each year to:
(a) The State Board; and
(b) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, created
pursuant to NRS 218E.320.
4. On or before September 30 of each school year, the board of
trustees of each school district and the governing body of each
charter school shall provide a written notice regarding the
examinations and assessments to all teachers and educational
personnel employed by the school district or governing body, all
personnel employed by the school district or governing body who
are involved in the administration of the examinations and
assessments, all pupils who are required to take the examinations or
assessments and all parents and legal guardians of such pupils. The
written notice must be prepared in a format that is easily understood
and must include, without limitation, a description of the:
(a) Plan adopted pursuant to this section; and
(b) Action that may be taken against personnel and pupils for
violations of the plan or for other irregularities in testing
administration or testing security.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Assessment” means the college and career readiness
assessment administered to pupils enrolled in grade 11 pursuant to
NRS 390.610.
(b) “Examination” means:
(1) The examinations that are administered to pupils pursuant
to NRS 390.105; and
-
*AB210*

– 8 –
(2) Any other examinations which measure the achievement
and proficiency of pupils and which are administered to pupils on a
district-wide basis.
(c) “Irregularity in testing administration” means the failure to
administer an examination or assessment in the manner intended by
the person or entity that created the examination or assessment.
(d) “Irregularity in testing security” means an act or omission
that tends to corrupt or impair the security of an examination or
assessment, including, without limitation:
(1) The failure to comply with security procedures adopted
pursuant to this section or NRS 390.270;
(2) The disclosure of questions or answers to questions on an
examination or assessment in a manner not otherwise approved by
law; and
(3) Other breaches in the security or confidentiality of the
questions or answers to questions on an examination or assessment.
Sec. 7. NRS 390.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.290 1. If the Department determines that:
(a) At least one irregularity in testing administration occurred at
a school, including, without limitation, a charter school, or in a
program of distance education during 1 school year on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105;
(b) In the immediately succeeding school year in which an
examination was administered pursuant to NRS 390.105, at least
one additional irregularity in testing administration occurred at that
school or in that program of distance education on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105; and
(c) Based upon the criteria set forth in subsection 2, the
irregularities described in paragraphs (a) and (b) warrant an
additional administration of the examinations,
 the Department shall notify the school and the school district in
which the school or program of distance education is located that
the school or program is required to provide for an additional
administration of the examinations to pupils who are enrolled in a
grade that is required to take the examinations pursuant to NRS
390.105 or to the pupils the Department determines must take the
additional administration pursuant to subsection 3. The additional
administration must occur in the same school year in which the
irregularity described in paragraph (b) occurred. Except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, the school district shall pay for all costs
related to the administration of examinations pursuant to this
subsection. If a charter school is required to administer
examinations pursuant to this subsection, the charter school shall
pay for all costs related to the administration of the examinations to
pupils enrolled in the charter school.
-
*AB210*

– 9 –
2. In determining whether to require a school or program of
distance education to provide for an additional administration of
examinations pursuant to this section, the Department shall
consider:
(a) The effect of each irregularity in testing administration,
including, without limitation, whether the irregularity required the
scores of pupils to be invalidated; and
(b) Whether sufficient time remains in the school year to
provide for an additional administration of examinations.
3. If the Department determines pursuant to subsection 2 that a
school or program of distance education must provide for an
additional administration of examinations, the Department may
consider whether the most recent irregularity in testing
administration affected the test scores of a limited number of pupils
and require the school or program to provide an additional
administration of examinations pursuant to this section only to those
pupils whose test scores were affected by the most recent
irregularity.
4. The Department shall provide as many notices pursuant to
this section during 1 school year as are applicable to the
irregularities occurring at a school [.] or in a program of distance
education. A school shall provide for additional administrations of
examinations pursuant to this section within 1 school year as
applicable to the irregularities occurring at the school [.] or in the
program.
Sec. 8. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 7, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB210*